Georgia statutes. 
36-82-78. Effect of judgment of validation.

Statute text

If no appeal is filed within the time prescribed by law or if an appeal is filed and the judgment is affirmed on appeal, the judgment of the superior court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor shall be forever conclusive against the governmental body upon the validity of such bonds and the security therefor.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 14; Ga. L. 1966, p. 48, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Conclusiveness of validation judgment. - Judgment of the superior court validating revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), unexcepted to, or affirmed on review, is conclusive against the municipality and the citizens of the municipality upon all questions, including the constitutionality of the statute under which the proceedings are had. Cox v. Georgia Educ. Auth., 225 Ga. 542, 170 S.E.2d 240 (1969).

Validation judgment regarding revenue bonds for a county's acquisition of a hospital, which had been found to be illegal, was nonetheless conclusive because the judgment had not been appealed and sale of the revenue bonds could not be enjoined. Turpen v. Rabun County Bd. of Comm'rs, 251 Ga. App. 505, 554 S.E.2d 727 (2001).

Validation order conclusive on intergovernmental contract's legitimacy. - See AMBAC Indem. Corp. v. Akridge, 262 Ga. 773, 425 S.E.2d 637, cert. denied, 510 U.S. 817, 114 S. Ct. 69, 126 L. Ed. 2d 38 (1993).

Action not barred as collateral attack. - Taxpayer's petition seeking a declaration that the valuation method a county board of assessors and the development authority of the county used for leasehold estates arising from a local development authority sale-leaseback bond transaction was illegal was not barred for being a collateral attack on concluded bond validation proceedings because the challenge to the memoranda of agreement that set forth the tax assessment formula at issue would only constitute a prohibited collateral attack on a concluded bond validation proceeding if the memoranda were specifically adjudicated in the proceedings and held valid by the bond judgment, and the board and authority had to put forth evidence that the applicable bond validation orders did in fact expressly rule upon each memorandum of agreement. Moreover, even if the taxpayer was barred from challenging the tax agreements on concluded bond transactions, the taxpayer also sought an injunction to prohibit the use of the formula in future bond agreements. Sherman v. Fulton County Bd. of Assessors, 288 Ga. 88, 701 S.E.2d 472 (2010).

Validation not conclusive as to tax exemption as public property. - Two bond validation orders pertaining to a hospital authority's establishment of a continuing care retirement center did not conclusively determine, for purposes of O.C.G.A. § 48-5-41(a)(1)(A), that the property was public property exempt from ad valorem taxation; remand was required for the trial court to address taxability. Columbus Board of Tax Assessors v. Medical Ctr. Hosp. Auth., 302 Ga. 358, 806 S.E.2d 525 (2017).

Cited in Gibbs v. City of Social Circle, 191 Ga. 422, 12 S.E.2d 335 (1940); Miller v. Columbus, 229 Ga. 234, 190 S.E.2d 535 (1972); Ferdinand v. City of Atlanta, 285 Ga. 121, 674 S.E.2d 309 (2009); Sherman v. Atlanta Indep. Sch. Sys., 293 Ga. 268, 744 S.E.2d 26 (2013).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 373 et seq.

36-82-79. Entry of reference to judgment on validated bonds; use of entry as evidence; clerk's fee.

Statute text

Bonds validated under this article shall have stamped or written thereon, by the proper officers of the governmental body issuing the same or by their agents or servants, the words "Validated and confirmed by judgment of the superior court," specifying also the date the judgment was rendered and the court in which it was rendered, which entry shall be signed by the clerk of the superior court in which the judgment was rendered. Such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of the judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state. If provisions in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds grant conversion or exchangeability privileges with respect thereto, upon request of the proper officers of the governmental body issuing bonds in exchange for bonds previously signed by a clerk of the superior court, it shall be the duty of such clerk of the superior court to sign the entry as to judgment of validation made on such bonds proposed to be issued in exchange. Such entry shall likewise be received as original evidence of the fact of such judgment in any court in this state. As specified in the general laws of this state, any clerk of a superior court may sign such entry as to the judgment of validation by a manual or a facsimile signature. The clerk of the superior court shall receive for his services rendered under this Code section the fee prescribed in Code Section 15-6-77.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 15; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 16, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 497, § 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2062, § 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2168 et seq.

36-82-80. Payment of costs of proceedings.

Statute text

The cost of the case shall be paid by the governmental body desiring to issue the bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 16.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Cited in Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 376.

36-82-81. Procedure when district attorney or Attorney General fails to file petition.

Statute text

When a governmental body passes a resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds and notice is duly served upon the district attorney or the Attorney General under the authority of such governmental body, for the purpose of securing a judicial validation of such bonds and the security therefor, but the district attorney or Attorney General fails to proceed within the time specified in Code Section 36-82-75, it shall be competent for such governmental body to represent such facts in writing to the court and to represent further that the failure has been without fault on the part of the governmental body. In such case, it shall be the duty of the court and he shall have the power and authority to inquire into the facts and, upon being satisfied that the failure has not arisen from any fault or neglect on the part of the governmental body, to pass an order authorizing and directing the district attorney or Attorney General to proceed within ten days to file the petition authorized by Code Section 36-82-75. Thereafter, the proceedings shall be had in the same manner as would have been followed had such petition been duly and promptly filed in the first instance.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 17.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Court authorized to grant leave to file when city without fault in original failure to file. - When the failure to file a validation petition within the requisite 20-day period is not because of the fault or negligence of the municipality, on application of the municipality in writing and upon a showing of such fact the superior court is authorized to order the solicitor general (now district attorney) to file such petition within 10 days thereafter. State v. Smallwood, 103 Ga. App. 400, 119 S.E.2d 297 (1961).

Intervention seeking validation denial for nonconformity with law not subject to dismissal. - Intervention filed by a resident and taxpayer of the municipality proposing to issue revenue bonds which seeks to have the validation denied and the proceedings dismissed because such petition was not filed in conformity with such laws is not subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss). State v. Smallwood, 103 Ga. App. 400, 119 S.E.2d 297 (1961).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 358, 360, 379, 380.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2173.

36-82-82. Effect of judgment of validation upon failure to file petition.

Statute text

When proceedings are had as provided in Code Section 36-82-81 and result in a judgment validating the bonds and the security therefor, the bonds shall be held and deemed to be as fully and completely validated to all intents and purposes as though the proceedings had been originally taken as provided by this article and the judgment of validation shall be finally and completely conclusive in like manner as provided by Code Section 36-82-78.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 18.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

36-82-83. Validation of revenue bonds of certain hospital authorities.

Statute text

When a hospital authority created and operating under Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, the "Hospital Authorities Law," is authorized to confirm and validate revenue bonds in accordance with the procedures of this article, and such an authority is located in more than one county, such bonds shall be confirmed and validated in the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the authority is located; and, where the authority is located in more than one judicial circuit, notice provided for the district attorney shall be served upon the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which the principal office of such an authority is located, in accordance with this article, which district attorney shall have the duties, privileges, and responsibilities and shall exercise the powers provided for district attorneys in revenue bond validation proceedings under this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 20, § 2; Ga. L. 1957, p. 36, § 2.)

36-82-84. Applicability of article to common carriers of passengers for hire.

Statute text

Wherever applicable, this article shall apply to public common carriers of passengers for hire.

History

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 453, § 2.)

36-82-85. Construction of article generally; applicability of certain other provisions of law.

Statute text

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, the powers conferred by any other general, special, or local law. The limitations imposed by this article shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special, or local law. Bonds may be issued under this article without regard to any other general, special, or local law. The General Assembly declares its intention that the limitations of the amount or percentage of, and the restrictions relating to, indebtedness of a governmental body and the incurring thereof contained in the Constitution of this state and in any general, special, or local law shall not apply to bonds and the issuance thereof under this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 19.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality and exhaustiveness of law. - Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) does not purport to be a general law exhaustive of the purposes for which revenue bonds or certificates may be issued and this is not violative of a constitutional provision that laws of a general nature shall have uniform operation throughout the state, and no special law shall be enacted in any case for which provisions have been made by an existing general law (Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV)). Sigman v. Brunswick Port Auth., 214 Ga. 332, 104 S.E.2d 467 (1958).

Municipal Electric Authority Act not contrary. - Provisions of the Municipal Electric Authority Act (O.C.G.A Art. 3, Ch. 3, T. 46) are not unlawful as being contrary to provisions of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36). Thompson v. Municipal Elec. Auth., 238 Ga. 19, 231 S.E.2d 720 (1976).

Bonds not debt within meaning of debt clause. - Bonds issued for financing certain income producing projects and payable solely from income produced thereby shall not be considered as debts within the meaning of the debt clause, Ga. Const. 1877, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I). City of Valdosta v. Singleton, 197 Ga. 194, 28 S.E.2d 759 (1944).

Cited in Sherman v. City of Atlanta, 317 Ga. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2013).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 395.

——————————

ARTICLE 4

BONDS

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 4, effective April 20, 2000, repealed and reserved the former article. The former article, relating to bonds for public contractors, consisted of Code Sections 36-82-100 through 36-82-105 and was based on Ga. L. 1910, p. 86, § 1, 2; Ga. L. 1916, p. 94, §§ 1, 3-5; Code 1933, §§ 23-1705-23-1709; Ga. L. 1956, p. 340, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 348, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 36; Ga. L. 1989, p. 461, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1003, § 1.

Code Section 36-82-104 was amended by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3. However, this amendment was not given effect due to the repeal of the former article by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 4.

36-82-100. Expenditure of bond proceeds; auditing.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "bonds" means any revenue or general obligation bonds issued under this chapter.

(b) When bonds are issued by a county, municipality, or local authority in the amount of $5 million or more, the expenditure of bond proceeds shall be subject to an ongoing performance audit or performance review as provided in this Code section; but this Code section shall not apply if such bond issue is below $5 million.

(c) Each county, municipality, or local authority expending bond proceeds shall provide for a continuing performance audit or performance review of the expenditure of such funds. The county, municipality, or local authority shall contract with a certified public accountant or with an outside auditor, consultant, or other provider accredited or certified in the field of performance audits or performance reviews. Such accountant, auditor, consultant, or other provider shall only be qualified to perform the audit and review functions under this Code section if such accountant, auditor, consultant, or other provider has significant experience and competence in conducting comprehensive audits and reviews in conformance with generally accepted government auditing standards. The performance audit or performance review contract shall:

(1) Include a goal of ensuring to the maximum extent possible that the bond funds are expended efficiently and economically, so as to secure to the county, municipality, or local authority the maximum possible benefit from the bond funds;

(2) Provide for the issuance of periodic public reports, made accessible through electronic or printed format, or both, at a location advertised in the legal organ not less often than once annually, with respect to the extent to which expenditures are meeting the goal specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

(3) Provide for the issuance of periodic public recommendations, made accessible through electronic or printed format, or both, at a location advertised in the legal organ not less often than once annually, for improvements in meeting the goal specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(d) The auditor, consultant, or other provider to carry out the performance audit or performance review shall be selected through a public request for proposals process. The reasonable cost of the performance audit or performance review shall be paid from the proceeds of the bonds unless a specific waiver of public accountability is included in a legal advertisement in bold print contained within requisite public notice soliciting public preapproval of the applicable bond issue which expressly states that no performance audit or performance review shall be conducted with respect to such bond issue.

(e) On and after May 5, 2006, the expenditure of bond proceeds shall be under the jurisdiction of and subject to review by the inspector general of this state with respect to any claim of fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement of funds.

(f) This Code section shall apply with respect to any bonds which are subject to the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section which are issued after May 5, 2006, until the proceeds of such bond issue have been expended.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-100, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 1021, § 2/HB 1012.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, "May 5, 2006," was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in subsections (e) and (f).

——————————

ARTICLE 5

REGULATION OF INTEREST RATES FOR BONDS AND OBLIGATIONS OTHER THAN GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS

36-82-120. Purpose of article.

Statute text

It is the purpose of this article to maintain the fiscal solvency of counties, municipal corporations, and political subdivisions of the state and authorities and public corporations created by the Constitution of Georgia or any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly in public borrowing by exempting from all other laws of the state governing usury or prescribing or limiting interest rates any bonds, notes, certificates, or obligations of any kind issued by any such county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, authority, or public corporation to evidence any repayment obligation for money borrowed, exclusive of general obligation bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

36-82-121. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, certificates, or obligations of any kind issued by any municipality to evidence any repayment obligation for money borrowed by such municipality, exclusive of general obligation bonds.

(2) "General obligation bonds" means any bonds, notes, certificates, or obligations of any kind issued by any municipality which, under the Constitution of Georgia, may not be issued without the consent of a majority of the qualified voters of the municipality affected, voting in an election for that purpose, and also shall mean any bonds, notes, certificates, or obligations of any kind issued to refund outstanding general obligation bonds without an election as authorized under Article IX, Section V, Paragraph III of the Constitution of Georgia.

(3) "Municipality" means any school district, county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of the state or any authority or public corporation created by the Constitution of Georgia or any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly which is as of March 16, 1981, or may thereafter be authorized by law to issue bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

36-82-122. Exemption of bonds from Constitution and laws of Georgia regulating interest rates; fixing of rates of interest by resolution or ordinance.

Statute text

(a) From and after March 16, 1981, any bonds issued by a municipality shall be exempt from:

(1) All laws of this state governing usury or prescribing or limiting interest rates to be borne by bonds; and

(2) All provisions of the Constitution of Georgia prescribing or limiting interest rates to be borne by bonds to the extent that the Constitution of Georgia permits the General Assembly by law to define further the powers and duties of any such municipality and to enlarge or restrict the same.

(b) The interest rate or rates to be borne by any bonds issued by a municipality shall be fixed by the governing body of such municipality in the resolution or ordinance adopted by such governing body to authorize the issuance of any such bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1603, §§ 1, 3.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Usury, § 7-4-1 et seq.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1982, p. 1603, § 2 ratified and reaffirmed all terms and provisions of Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, as amended by the 1982 Act, and declared that such terms and provisions were of full force and effect. Ga. L. 1982, p. 1603, § 2 stood repealed on November 1, 1982, as provided in § 5(b) of the 1982 Act.

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

36-82-123. Repeal of regulations as to interest rates contained in other laws.

Statute text

All provisions contained in any of the following laws which prescribe or limit the interest rate or rates to be borne by bonds are repealed to the extent the same are in conflict with this article and to the extent necessary to effect the purpose of this article by exempting any bonds issued by a municipality from all laws of the state governing usury or prescribing or limiting interest rates to be borne by bonds:

(1) Article 3 of this chapter, the "Revenue Bond Law";

(2) Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, the "Hospital Authorities Law";

(3) Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 8, the "Housing Authorities Law";

(4) Chapter 62 of this title, the "Development Authorities Law"; and

(5) Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, pertaining to the Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, § 4.)

36-82-124. Construction of article.

Statute text

This article shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof; and insofar as the provisions of this article may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, or inconsistent with the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this article shall control.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 384, § 5.)

——————————

ARTICLE 6

FORM AND SERVICES CONNECTED WITH CREATION OF REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS

36-82-140. Use of facsimile signatures and seals; contracts with financial institutions to perform certain repayment functions; evidence of repayment obligations.

Statute text

Notwithstanding the provisions of other laws to the contrary, the following revisions of relevant laws shall apply to any municipality, as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-82-121, which incurs bonded indebtedness:

(1) If a bond is to be issued to evidence the repayment obligation for borrowed money, the signatures of all officers of the municipality required by law or by the proceedings related to such borrowed money to sign such bond may be facsimile signatures and any seal required to be affixed thereon may be a facsimile seal if provision is also made for a manual authenticating signature on the bond by or on behalf of a designated financial institution or other person or other municipality with whom the municipality has a contract as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this Code section with respect to such bond. In addition, any officer may adopt as a facsimile signature the signature or facsimile signature of a predecessor in office in the event the signature or facsimile signature of such predecessor appears on such bond;

(2) (A) Any municipality borrowing money may contract for the services of a financial institution or other person within or without the state or another municipality to perform any of the following functions with respect to repayment obligations for borrowed money:

(i) Issuance, authentication, transfer, registration, exchange, and related mechanical and clerical functions;

(ii) Record or bookkeeping or book entry functions;

(iii) Preparation, signing, and issuance of checks or warrants in payment of repayment obligations for borrowed money;

(iv) Preparation and maintenance of reports and accounts; and

(v) Performance of any other duties related to repayment obligations for borrowed money.

(B) The cost of performing the aforesaid functions, whether incurred under a contract or through direct performance by the municipality, may be paid from the borrowed moneys or from other funds lawfully available for the purpose; and

(3) (A) Whenever any municipality shall borrow money any repayment obligation with respect thereto may be evidenced:

(i) By bonds issued in such form either coupon or fully registered or both coupon and fully registered in such denominations and with such provisions for registration, exchangeability, and transferability as the resolution authorizing the borrowing of money or any loan agreement, trust agreement, or other contract or agreement to be entered into in connection with the borrowing of money may provide;

(ii) By book entries under which the right to receive payments of principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest shall be established and transferred only through subsequent book entries; or

(iii) In such other manner as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the borrowing of money or any loan agreement, trust agreement, or other contract or agreement to be entered into in connection with the borrowing of money.

(B) If any municipality elects to evidence any repayment obligation for borrowed money in a manner permitted by division (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph:

(i) No bond shall be issued to evidence such repayment obligation, and the adoption by the municipality of the resolution authorizing the borrowing of such money and the execution and delivery by the municipality of the loan agreement, trust agreement, or other contract or agreement to be entered into in connection with the borrowing of such money and the receipt by the municipality or by an agent acting on behalf of the municipality of the money borrowed shall be the only requirement to establish lawfully the repayment obligation with respect to such borrowed money; and

(ii) The municipality shall provide for the sending of written statements which provide a record of certain rights with respect to such repayment obligation as of the time of issuance of the statements. Such statements shall be sent each person acquiring rights by registration in such repayment obligation but shall, in and of themselves, confer no rights on the recipient and shall be neither a negotiable instrument nor a security.

(C) In the event any municipality elects to evidence any such repayment obligation in a manner permitted by division (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the provisions of any other law of this state to the contrary notwithstanding, the interest of any person in such repayment obligation may be accepted, to the extent of such interest, as a deposit of the repayment obligation to which it relates, provided that the municipality has provided by contract for the pledge of such interest.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-140, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 839, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

36-82-141. Records of ownership, registration, transfer, and exchange of repayment obligations not public records.

Statute text

The records of ownership, registration, transfer, and exchange of repayment obligations for borrowed money and of persons to whom payment with respect to such obligations is made shall not be public records, it being understood that the availability of such records to the general public would likely have a serious adverse impact on the ability of a municipality to consummate subsequent borrowings of money at the most advantageous cost to such municipality.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-141, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 839, § 2.)

36-82-142. Construction of article.

Statute text

This article shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof; and insofar as the provisions of this article may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, or inconsistent with the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly relating to bonds issued by any municipality, this article shall control.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-142, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 839, § 2.)

——————————

ARTICLE 7

REGULATION OF BONDS AND OBLIGATIONS ISSUED BY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

36-82-160. Requirements for filing; forms; exemptions.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1033, § 2, effective April 27, 2001.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This article was based on Code 1981, § 36-82-160, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36 and reserved by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1033, § 2.

——————————

ARTICLE 8

GEORGIA ALLOCATION SYSTEM

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, effective January 1, 1988, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of §§ 36-82-180 through 36-82-200, concerning the Georgia Allocation Plan, and was based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 1143, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 344, § 2.

36-82-180. Short title.

Statute text

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Allocation System."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-180, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

36-82-181. Legislative purpose.

Statute text

The economic development and the availability of safe, sanitary, and affordable housing in the State of Georgia are of vital importance to the state and its citizens. Private activity bond financing has been an integral part of the state's program for economic development and affordable housing. The United States government has enacted a law which limits the availability of private activity bond financing within each state. This limited resource must be used in the best interest of the State of Georgia to the fullest extent permitted by federal law. The federal law limits the annual issuance of private activity bonds in the state to an amount not exceeding a state ceiling imposed under the federal law. The federal law not only provides for a distribution of the state ceiling but also provides that a state may by law provide for a different formula for allocating the state ceiling among the governmental units or other authorities in the state having authority to issue private activity bonds. The purpose of this article is to implement a system for allocating the use of private activity bonds, as permitted by federal law, in order to further the economic development of the state, to further the provision of safe, sanitary, and affordable housing, and otherwise to further the purposes of the laws of the state which provide for the issuance of such bonds.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-181, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Financing Affordable Housing in Georgia: The Possibility of a Dedicated Revenue Source," see 13 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 363 (1997).

36-82-182. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Amount" means, when used with respect to bonds, notices of allocation, or portions of the state ceiling, an amount measured in terms of United States dollars.

(2) "Application" means the application and amendments thereto for a notice of allocation required to be filed by an issuer with the department pursuant to this article.

(3) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, or other obligations which would be included or treated as private activity bonds for the purpose of the state's volume cap under Section 146 of the Federal Code. Section 146 of the Federal Code provides that, for purposes of that section, the term "private activity bond" shall not include the specifically designated types of bonds which would, under other provisions of the Federal Code, constitute private activity bonds; and for purposes of this article, the term "bonds" shall mean only those bonds, notes, or other obligations subject to the volume cap under Section 146 of the Federal Code. For purposes of this article, the term "bonds" shall include the private activity portion of governmental use bonds.

(4) "Borrower" means any person or persons whose private business use, within the meaning of Section 141 of the Federal Code, would cause any bonds to constitute private activity bonds within the meaning of Section 141 of the Federal Code. If there is more than one such person with respect to any issue of bonds, then the term "borrower" shall mean and include each and every such person known at the time that the issuer files an application.

(5) "Business day" means a day on which the department is open for business. The term "business day" shall not include any Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday officially observed by the state.

(6) "Carryforward election application" means the application for a notice of allocation for a carryforward project required to be filed by an issuer with all attachments and amendments.

(7) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs.

(8) "Competitive pool" means that portion of the state ceiling set aside prior to April 1, 1990.

(9) "Confirmation of issuance" means the issuer's confirmation, in writing, that the bonds authorized by a notice of allocation have been issued, in such form as the commissioner may promulgate from time to time.

(10) "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

(11) "Economic development share" means that portion of the state ceiling established in accordance with Code Section 36-82-186.

(12) "Employment test" means either of the employment tests set forth in Code Section 36-82-188.

(13) "Exempt facility bond" means any bond described as an exempt facility bond in Section 142 of the Federal Code, other than any obligation described in Section 142(a)(1) or Section 142(a)(2) of the Federal Code and any obligation described in Section 142(a)(6) of the Federal Code which is issued as part of an issue if all of the property to be financed by the net proceeds of such issue is to be owned by a governmental unit, within the meaning of Section 146 of the Federal Code.

(14) "Expiration date" means the final date on which bonds covered by a notice of allocation may be issued and by which date confirmation of issuance must be filed with the department.

(15) "Federal Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(16) "Filing date" means the final date for filing an application as specified in this article.

(17) "Flexible pool" means that portion of the state ceiling set aside prior to April 1, 1990.

(18) "Flexible share" means that portion of the state ceiling set aside, in accordance with Code Section 36-82-193, for discretionary use by the department.

(19) "Georgia Housing and Finance Authority" means the authority established under Chapter 26 of Title 50.

(20) "HoDAG" means a housing development action grant as administered by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(21) "Housing bonds" means multifamily housing bonds, single-family housing bonds, or other qualified housing bonds, as the case may be.

(22) "Housing share" means the portion of the state ceiling established in accordance with Code Section 36-83-189.

(23) "Issued" means, with respect to any issue of bonds, that such bonds have been delivered and paid for in full. Payment in full may be made, in whole or in part, by a binding, enforceable agreement to make payment in the future.

(24) "Issuer" means the political subdivision, governmental unit, authority, or other entity which issues any bonds.

(25) "Legal counsel" means an attorney or firm of attorneys duly authorized to practice law in the State of Georgia and admitted to practice before the highest court in the State of Georgia.

(26) "Local housing authorities" means any issuers of multifamily housing bonds, single-family housing bonds, or other qualified housing bonds created and existing under the laws of this state.

(27) "Mortgage credit certificate" means a certificate issued under a qualified mortgage credit certificate program within the meaning of Section 25 of the Federal Code.

(28) "Multifamily housing bond" means any obligation which constitutes an exempt facility bond for the financing of a qualified residential rental project within the meaning of Section 142 of the Federal Code.

(29) "Notice of allocation" means the notice given by the department allocating to an issuer a specified amount from the state ceiling for a specific issue of bonds.

(30) "Period" means any of the time periods into which the calendar year is divided for purposes of authorizing a percentage of the state ceiling to be used during such period as provided in this article as follows: period 1 begins January 1 and ends at midnight on March 31; period 2 begins April 1 and ends at midnight on June 30; period 3 begins July 1 and ends at midnight on September 30; and period 4 begins on October 1 and ends at midnight on December 31.

(31) "Person" means any individual, corporation, limited or general partnership, association, trust, or other entity of any nature whatsoever.

(32) "Policy guidelines" means the policy guidelines set forth in Code Section 36-82-195.

(33) "Private activity portion of governmental use bonds" means the amount of any obligation, treated as a nonqualified amount under Section 141 of the Federal Code, which is in excess of $15 million and which would cause the obligation to be treated as a private activity bond under Section 141(b)(5) of the Federal Code, unless the amount equal to the excess of the nonqualifying amount over $15 million receives an allocation of the state's volume cap under Section 146 of the Federal Code.

(34) "Project" means the facility, as described in an application, proposed to be financed, in whole or in part, by an issue of bonds.

(35) "Qualified application" means a completed application for a notice of allocation.

(36) "Qualified housing project" means a project for which the issuance or exchange of tax-exempt bonds under the Federal Code for qualified housing purposes requires an allocation from the state ceiling.

(37) "Reservations" means the amounts reserved for the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority, the urban residential finance authorities, and the local housing authorities in Code Section 36-82-190.
